Alaska, session 34, SB284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 04.16.030(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) A licensee, an agent, or employee may not knowingly [WITH CRIMINAL 06 NEGLIGENCE] 07 (1) sell, give, or barter alcoholic beverages to a drunken person; 08 (2) allow another person to sell, give, or barter an alcoholic beverage 09 to a drunken person within licensed premises; 10 (3) allow a drunken person to enter and remain within licensed 11 premises or to consume an alcoholic beverage within licensed premises; 12 (4) permit a drunken person to sell or serve alcoholic beverages. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 04.21.020 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 14 (f) In an action under (a) of this section, the intoxicated person has no right of 01 recovery and is primarily liable for any injury resulting from their intoxication. 02 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 03 read: 04 APPLICABILITY. AS 04.16.030(a), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to 05 offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.